Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.215

Hearings—Extreme risk protection orders.

For extreme risk protection order hearings, the following also apply.

(1) The court may:

(a) Examine under oath the petitioner, the respondent, and any witnesses they may produce, or, in lieu of examination, consider sworn declarations of the petitioner, the respondent, and any witnesses they may produce; and

(b) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted for criminal history records and civil protection order history related to the respondent.

(2) During the hearing, the court shall consider whether a behavioral health evaluation is appropriate, and may order such evaluation if appropriate.

(3) In determining whether grounds for an extreme risk protection order exist, the court may consider any relevant evidence including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(a) A recent act or threat of violence by the respondent against self or others, whether or not such violence or threat of violence involves a firearm;

(b) A pattern of acts or threats of violence by the respondent within the past 12 months including, but not limited to, acts or threats of violence by the respondent against self or others;

(c) Any behaviors that present an imminent threat of harm to self or others;

(d) A violation by the respondent of a protection order or a no-contact order issued;

(e) A previous or existing extreme risk protection order issued against the respondent;

(f) A violation of a previous or existing extreme risk protection order issued against the respondent;

(g) A conviction of the respondent for a crime that constitutes domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;

(h) A conviction of the respondent under RCW 9A.36.080;

(i) The respondent's ownership of, access to, or intent to possess, firearms;

(j) The unlawful or reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm by the respondent;

(k) The history of use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force by the respondent against another person, or the respondent's history of stalking another person;

(l) Any prior arrest of the respondent for a felony offense or violent crime;

(m) Corroborated evidence of the abuse of controlled substances or alcohol by the respondent; and

(n) Evidence of recent acquisition of firearms by the respondent.

[ 2021 c 215 s 27.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.